Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin METROPOLITAN AREA MOBILITY HUB WORKING GROUP.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "mobility hub" means a location where a person can access multiple modes of transportation and make connections between the different modes. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The Metropolitan Council must convene a working group to evaluate and provide recommendations to facilitate the creation of mobility hubs and related transit advantage improvements on high-frequency and high-ridership bus routes in the metropolitan area, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin The working group consists of the following members: new text end new text begin (1) one member appointed by the Metropolitan Council; new text end new text begin (2) one member appointed by the commissioner of transportation; new text end new text begin (3) one member appointed by the Minneapolis City Council; new text end new text begin (4) one member appointed by the St. Paul City Council; new text end new text begin (5) one member appointed by the Hennepin County Board; new text end new text begin (6) one member appointed by the Ramsey County Board; new text end new text begin (7) one member appointed by the Center for Transportation Studies at the University of Minnesota; and new text end new text begin (8) one member appointed by Move Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Appointments. new text end new text begin (a) The appointing authorities under subdivision 3 must make the appointments by July 31, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The appointing authorities under subdivision 3 may appoint a designee who is an employee of the respective organization or agency. new text end new text begin (c) Appointments to the working group are made pursuant to Minnesota Statutes, section 15.0597. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin At a minimum, the working group must: new text end new text begin (1) assess the current status and potential use of mobility hubs among the relevant road authorities in the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (2) identify key barriers to the creation and use of mobility hubs and recommend measures to address the barriers; new text end new text begin (3) explore methods for ongoing coordination among the relevant road authorities; new text end new text begin (4) estimate costs of potential improvements; and new text end new text begin (5) develop proposals or recommendations to develop mobility hubs and related transit advantage improvements, including a prioritized listing of locations, necessary policy changes at the relevant road authorities, and funding sources. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The Metropolitan Council must convene the first meeting of the working group no later than September 15, 2026. new text end new text begin (b) The working group must establish a schedule for meetings and meet as necessary to accomplish the duties under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Administration. new text end new text begin The Metropolitan Council must provide administrative and technical support to the working group and must assist in creating the report under subdivision 8. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin By February 13, 2027, the Metropolitan Council must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over transportation policy and finance. At a minimum, the report must: new text end new text begin (1) summarize the activities of the working group; and new text end new text begin (2) provide findings and recommendations adopted by the working group. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The working group under this section expires June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end